Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2002YH (1) 91 ss/ko H.F. 105 Section 1. Section 124E.2, subsection 10, Code 2025, is 1 amended by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu 2 thereof the following: 3 10. âMedical cannabidiolâ means any species of the genus 4 cannabis plant, or any mixture or preparation thereof, 5 including whole plant extracts and resins, that is delivered 6 in any of the following forms: 7 a. Oral forms, including but not limited to: 8 (1) Tablets. 9 (2) Capsules. 10 (3) Liquids. 11 (4) Tinctures. 12 (5) Sublingual forms. 13 b. Topical forms, including but not limited to: 14 (1) Gels. 15 (2) Ointments, creams, or lotions. 16 (3) Transdermal patches. 17 c. Inhaled forms, limited to: 18 (1) Nebulizable inhaled forms. 19 (2) Vaporizable dried raw cannabis. 20 (3) Other vaporizable forms of cannabis. 21